Wisconsin, session 2025, AB44.
do enact as follows:AB44,15Section 1. 69.01 (1g) of the statutes is created to read:AB44,2,2169.01 (1g) “Advanced practice nurse prescriber” means an advanced practice 2nurse who is certified under s. 441.16 (2) to issue prescription orders.AB44,23Section 2. 69.01 (6g) of the statutes is amended to read:AB44,2,7469.01 (6g) “Date of death” means the date that a person is pronounced dead by 5a physician, naturopathic doctor, coroner, deputy coroner, medical examiner, deputy 6medical examiner, physician assistant, advanced practice nurse prescriber, or 7hospice nurse.AB44,38Section 3. 69.18 (1) (cL) of the statutes is created to read:AB44,2,12969.18 (1) (cL) Except as provided in par. (cm), for purposes of preparation of 10the death record and in accordance with accepted medical standards, an advanced 11practice nurse prescriber who is directly involved with the care of a patient who dies 12may pronounce the date, time, and place of the patient’s death.AB44,2,1313